Utah statutes.
41-6a-1806.   Compliance -- Civil litigation.

The failure to use a child restraint device or to wear a safety belt:

(1)  does not constitute contributory or comparative negligence on the part of a person seeking recovery for injuries; and

(2)  may not be introduced as evidence in any civil litigation on the issue of negligence, injuries, or the mitigation of damages.

